Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
212

FOREIGN-TRADE
ZONES

Section

212-1 "Act of Congress" defined

212-2 "Public corporation" defined

212-3 Designation and approval of governor for
application

212-4 Grant of authority to governor; rules and
regulations

212-5 Setting aside public lands; lease,
license, and

permits

212-5.5 Foreign-trade zone; jurisdiction

212-6 Establishment, operation, and maintenance
of zone

212-7 Powers; indemnity or assurance to the United States and

deposits with United States

212-8 Exemption from taxes

212-9 Special fund

212-10 Personnel

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next